Vermont, session 2025-2026, H551.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. chapter 5, subchapter 3 is redesignated to read:
Subchapter 3. Minimum Wages and Overtime Pay
Sec. 2. 21 V.S.A. § 388 is added to read:
§ 388. OVERTIME PAY FOR FIREFIGHTERS
(a) No State, municipal, or county fire department shall employ any full-
time firefighter, as defined in 20 V.S.A. § 3151(4), excluding civilian
employees, for an average workweek longer than 42 hours unless the
firefighter is compensated at the rate of one and one-half times the firefighter’s
regular wage rate for all hours worked in excess of 42 hours based upon an
average workweek.
VT LEG #385668 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.551
2026 Page 2 of 2
(b) An average workweek shall be calculated using the prior eight-week
period, based upon a seven-day workweek.
(c) For the purposes of this section, “hours worked” includes all paid leave.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385668 v.1